Louisiana, session 2026, SB428.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:554.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§554.1. No implied obligations for pipeline servitudes covered by contract
A. As used in this Section, the following terms shall have the following
meanings:
(1) "Pipeline" means any pipeline, gathering line, transmission,
distribution line, or associated appurtenance, whether onshore or offshore, used
or intended for the transportation, injection, sequestration, storage, or
movement of any gaseous, liquid, supercritical, or multiphase substance,
including but not limited to the following:
(a) Natural gas, methane, hydrogen, carbon dioxide.
(b) Crude oil, refined petroleum products, natural gas liquids.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1422 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 428
(c) Produced water, brine, or other substances regulated by state or
federal law.
(2) "Pipeline operator" means any person or entity that owns, operates,
maintains, or controls a pipeline.
B. Notwithstanding Civil Code Article 645 or any other provision of law
to the contrary, when a right of use for a pipeline is created by a conventional
obligation, the rules governing usufruct and predial servitudes cannot impose
on the pipeline operator any affirmative duty that is not stated in the contract.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall be given prospective application only and
shall apply to all claims and causes of action that arise on or after the effective date of this
Act.